Wyoming statutes. Constitution of the State of Wyoming
Article 1. Declaration of Rights
§ 9. Trial by jury inviolate.

The right of trial by jury shall remain inviolate in criminal cases. A jury in civil cases and in criminal cases where the charge is a misdemeanor may consist of less than twelve (12) persons but not less than six (6), as may be prescribed by law. A grand jury may consist of twelve (12) persons, any nine (9) of whom concurring may find an indictment. The legislature may change, regulate or abolish the grand jury system. (As amended by Laws 1980, Senate Joint Resolution No. 1, p. 528.)

Cross references. —

As to trial by jury in civil cases, see chapter 11 of title 1 and Rules 38, 39 (a) and (c), 47 and 48, W.R.C.P.

As to grand jury, see chapter 5 of title 7.

As to jury trial in criminal cases, see chapter 11 of title 7 and Rules 24 (a) and 25, W.R. Cr. P.

Accused does not need notice and opportunity to be heard before grand jury

in order to protect his constitutional right to due process. Hennigan v. State, 746 P.2d 360,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 536

(Wyo. 1987).

This section does not mandate trial by jury but guarantees it.

Robbins v. State, 635 P.2d 781,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 382

(Wyo. 1981).

Right to jury trial inapplicable to eminent domain proceeding. —

The general expression in this section that the right to trial by jury shall remain inviolate does not apply to or affect a proceeding to condemn property under the power of eminent domain. In the absence of an express provision in the constitution granting it, a jury trial is not a constitutional right in such cases. Edwards v. Cheyenne, 19 Wyo. 110, 114 P. 677,

1911 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(Wyo. 1911), reh'g denied, 19 Wyo. 110, 122 P. 900,

1912 Wyo. LEXIS 1

(Wyo. 1912).

Or injunctive proceeding. —

Public service commission could enjoin defendant from operating motor vehicle over state highways without permit and defendant could not challenge act authorizing district courts to restrain violations on ground act was unconstitutional for failing to provide right of trial by jury in criminal case. Public Serv. Comm'n v. Grimshaw, 49 Wyo. 158, 53 P.2d 1,

1935 Wyo. LEXIS 15

(Wyo. 1935).

Contempt proceedings not “criminal case.” —

Proceedings against defendant in connection with a citation for contempt was not a “criminal case” within the meaning of that term as used in this section. Weiss v. State ex rel. Cardine, 455 P.2d 904,

1969 Wyo. LEXIS 145

(Wyo. 1969), cert. denied, 398 U.S. 927, 90 S. Ct. 1815, 26 L. Ed. 2d 89, 1970 U.S. LEXIS 1748 (1970). But see Skinner v. State, 838 P.2d 715,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 127

(Wyo. 1992).

Termination of parental rights may not be interpreted as a “criminal case”

in order that this section will be permitted to insure a jury trial. In re Matter of GP, 679 P.2d 976,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 269

(Wyo. 1984).

Also, right to jury trial in parental-termination action cannot be characterized as fundamental.

Neither the federal nor the state constitution secures a jury trial in this civil action. In re Matter of GP, 679 P.2d 976,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 269

(Wyo. 1984).

Defendant's right to a fair trial.—

Defendant was deprived of a fair trial because prosecutorial misconduct occurred when the State of Wyoming failed to comply with the district court’s discovery order and when the prosecutor made improper comments during closing argument and because the district court abused its discretion in requiring defendant to wear a leg restraint at trial without conducting a hearing to evaluate the necessity for the restraint. Black v. State, 2017 WY 135, 405 P.3d 1045,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 142

(Wyo. 2017).

Possibility of imprisonment raises right to jury. —

When an ordinance provides that imprisonment may be a part of the penalty, the accused is entitled to a jury for that reason, and it is his right to be so tried regardless of whether the sentence ultimately imposed includes a term of imprisonment. Lapp v. Worland, 612 P.2d 868,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 283

(Wyo. 1980).

Jury trial not required where initial violation only results in fine. —

Unless multiple convictions under a statute result in mandatory incarceration, a jury trial is not required where the initial violation will result only in a fine. City of Casper v. Fletcher, 916 P.2d 473,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 70

(Wyo. 1996).

Jury trial required only when confinement more than six months. —

A jury trial in a case of criminal contempt is required only if the party guilty of contempt is exposed to confinement for more than six months. Skinner v. State, 838 P.2d 715,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 127

(Wyo. 1992) (decided under former Rule 41 of the Wyoming Rules of Criminal Procedure). But see Weiss v. State, 455 P.2d 904,

1969 Wyo. LEXIS 145

(Wyo. 1969), cert. denied, 398 U.S. 927, 90 S. Ct. 1815, 26 L. Ed. 2d 89, 1970 U.S. LEXIS 1748 (U.S. 1970).

Municipal court jury trial for DWUI offense. —

There is a right to a jury trial in municipal court upon a charge of driving while under the influence of intoxicating liquor (DWUI), which is a serious offense, although the municipal DWUI ordinance provides for a maximum fine of $750 only and no jail term. City of Casper v. Cheatham, 739 P.2d 1222,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 471

(Wyo. 1987).

Provision, providing that police court cases tried without jury, unconstitutional. —

Section

5-6-207

, which provides that cases in police court for violations of city ordinances shall be tried without a jury, unconditionally denies the right to a jury trial in all cases in municipal court involving violations of city ordinances without regard to the potential sentences and is therefore unconstitutional. Brenner v. Casper, 723 P.2d 558,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 594

(Wyo. 1986).

Court may deny jury trial on issue of damages in default case.

Farrell v. Hursh Agency, 713 P.2d 1174,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 483

(Wyo. 1986).

Essential element of trial by jury is that there be impartial jurors,

who unanimously decide the facts in controversy under the direction of a judge. Lapp v. Worland, 612 P.2d 868,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 283

(Wyo. 1980).

Fair trial right not violated by inflammatory publicity. —

The court did not abuse its discretion in denying a change of venue where the effects of inflammatory publicity on potential jurors were mitigated by a carefully controlled voir dire so as to avoid the denial of a fair trial to the defendant. Armstrong v. State, 826 P.2d 1106,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(Wyo. 1992).

Right to fair trial not violated by prosecutor's remarks. —

In a vehicular homicide case, defendant's right to a fair trial was not violated by prosecutor's remarks during opening and closing argument regarding the effect that the victim's death would have on family and friends where the evidence of defendant's guilt was overwhelming, the district court gave a jury instruction immediately prior to the prosecutor's opening statement, and the district court also specifically instructed the jury to disregard the prosecutor's remarks immediately after they occurred. Whitney v. State, 2004 WY 118, 99 P.3d 457,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 154

(Wyo. 2004), cert. denied, 544 U.S. 1001, 125 S. Ct. 1931, 161 L. Ed. 2d 775, 2005 U.S. LEXIS 3570 (U.S. 2005).

Prosecutorial Misconduct. —

Defendant's conviction was reversed because (1) the prosecution pervasively used improper “was she lying” questions to undermine defendant's credibility when that was the central issue, (2) the prosecution did not have a strong case, (3) efforts to cure the prosecution's error were ineffective, and (3) defendant did not invite the error, and counsel timely objected. McGinn v. State, 2015 WY 140, 361 P.3d 295,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 157

(Wyo. 2015).

Right to jury trial not violated by the court's consideration of enhancement factors. —

Court rejected defendant's claim that the trial court violated his right to a jury trial by improperly considering his character, motives and selfishness in imposing consecutive five- to eight-year prison sentences on his forgery convictions, which factors were not admitted by defendant or found by a jury as required by Apprendi v. New Jersey, 530 U.S. 466, 120 S. Ct. 2348, 147 L. Ed. 2d 435, 2000 U.S. LEXIS 4304 (2000) and Blakely v. Washington, 542 U.S. 296, 124 S. Ct. 2531, 159 L. Ed. 2d 403, 2004 U.S. LEXIS 4573 (2004) because defendant's sentence did not exceed the maximum penalty provided in Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 6-3-602(b) and Apprendi and Blakely were cases in which the determination of facts could enhance a criminal penalty beyond the prescribed statutory maximum. Davis v. State, 2005 WY 93, 117 P.3d 454,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 113

(Wyo. 2005).

Concept of jury trial is not inflexible in all details,

so long as the essential elements of the institution are preserved. Lapp v. Worland, 612 P.2d 868,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 283

(Wyo. 1980).

Jury trial waivable by defendant. —

Right to a common-law jury trial in Wyoming is a right which belongs to the defendant and which may be waived. Taylor v. State, 612 P.2d 851,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 278

(Wyo. 1980).

Requisite inquiry on adequacy of jury waiver

is: (1) was the waiver express; and (2) was it knowing, intelligent and voluntary. Robbins v. State, 635 P.2d 781,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 382

(Wyo. 1981).

Showing required in questioning jury composition. —

It is fundamental in questioning the composition of a jury that a mere showing that a class was not represented in a particular jury is not enough; there must be a clear showing that its absence was caused by discrimination. Boyd v. State, 528 P.2d 287,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 247

(Wyo. 1974), cert. denied, 423 U.S. 871, 96 S. Ct. 137, 46 L. Ed. 2d 102, 1975 U.S. LEXIS 2819 (U.S. 1975).

Simplest method by which any defendant could challenge a jury

as being selected by systematic and intentional exclusion of any group of persons would be to present the names of various persons who were entitled to be on the jury list and whose names were not contained thereon. Boyd v. State, 528 P.2d 287,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 247

(Wyo. 1974), cert. denied, 423 U.S. 871, 96 S. Ct. 137, 46 L. Ed. 2d 102, 1975 U.S. LEXIS 2819 (U.S. 1975).

Merely because no blacks are on a jury panel there is no presumption

of systematic and intentional exclusion because of color. Boyd v. State, 528 P.2d 287,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 247

(Wyo. 1974), cert. denied, 423 U.S. 871, 96 S. Ct. 137, 46 L. Ed. 2d 102, 1975 U.S. LEXIS 2819 (U.S. 1975).

Women permitted to serve as jurors. —

The clause in this section in which the word “men” appears was not inserted for the purpose of preventing the legislature from changing the statutes in effect in regard to the persons competent for jury service. The legislature was therefore entitled to enact ch. 61, Laws 1949, duly incorporated in §

1-11-101

, which permitted women to serve as petit jurors in criminal and civil cases in the district court. Such act did not violate this section. State v. Yazzie, 67 Wyo. 256, 218 P.2d 482,

1950 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo. 1950).

Right of women to sit as jurors in criminal case can only be asserted by woman. —

Even if a woman on a criminal prosecution would have a right to women on the jury under art. 6, § 1, Wyo. Const., a male citizen, on a prosecution against him, cannot complain that women were excluded from the jury, since the right of women to sit as jurors, if it is a right, can only be asserted by a woman. McKinney v. State, 3 Wyo. 719, 30 P. 293,

1892 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 1892).

Prosecutorial misconduct not prejudicial due to court instructions. —

In an arson case, defendant was not denied his right to a fair trial based on prosecutorial misconduct where the prosecutor made a valid inquiry into defendant's ability to recall with accuracy the events that occurred before, during and after the time of the fire. The prosecutor made an improper comment regarding defendant “skipping out on a bill,” the district court sustained an objection, and the jury was given both oral and written instructions to disregard any testimony for which an objection was sustained. In addition, the existence of a check was as well known to defendant, as it was to the prosecution, so the evidence was not withheld. Strickland v. State, 2004 WY 91, 94 P.3d 1034,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 118

(Wyo. 2004).

Unanimity of verdict required. —

Statute which dispenses with unanimity of verdict is unconstitutional. First Nat'l Bank v. Foster, 9 Wyo. 157, 61 P. 466,

1900 Wyo. LEXIS 10

(Wyo. 1900), reh'g denied, 9 Wyo. 157, 63 P. 1056,

1901 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Wyo. 1901).

Poll of jury ensured that verdict was unanimous.

Vargas-Rocha v. State, 891 P.2d 763,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 37

(Wyo. 1995).

Unanimous verdict waivable with consent of court. —

Defendant has a qualified right to intelligently and voluntarily waive his right to a unanimous verdict, contingent only upon the consent of the court and the state, providing the waiver conforms strictly to constitutional standards. Taylor v. State, 612 P.2d 851,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 278

(Wyo. 1980).

Conditions which must be met before less-than-unanimous verdict may be accepted.

See Taylor v. State, 612 P.2d 851,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 278

(Wyo. 1980).

Lesser-included offense within jury verdict sustained. —

Even though the jury incorrectly concluded that the necessary elements were present to elevate the defendant's crime from burglary to aggravated burglary, an examination of the record disclosed there was sufficient evidence presented to justify the jury's finding that each of the elements of burglary was met. Therefore, the defendant's conviction for the crime of aggravated burglary was set aside, but his conviction was sustained as to the lesser included offense of burglary. Such an action was not a violation of the defendant's due process right under U.S. Const., amend. XIV, § 1 and Wyo. Const., art. 1, § 6, or of his right to a trial by jury under Wyo. Const., art. 1, § 9. Simonds v. State, 762 P.2d 1189,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 128

(Wyo. 1988).

Jurors willing to impose death penalty not unreliable where protective instructions given. —

The jurors ultimately selected to sit on the defendant's case did not become prosecution prone, prejudiced, unrepresentative or unreliable because of a willingness to impose the death penalty, if justified, where adequate protective instructions were given. State ex rel. Hopkinson v. District Court, 696 P.2d 54,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 455

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 474 U.S. 865, 106 S. Ct. 187, 88 L. Ed. 2d 155, 1985 U.S. LEXIS 4988 (U.S. 1985).

Mitigating circumstances individually weighed by death-penalty jurors. —

The jury must be told by the trial court in a death sentence case that mitigating circumstances need not be found unanimously by the jury, but that mitigating circumstances may be found by individual jurors and weighed by them individually in deciding the life or death question. Engberg v. Meyer, 820 P.2d 70,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 160

(Wyo. 1991) (decided under facts existing prior to 1989 amendment of §

6-2-102

).

Grand jury continued in use concurrently with accusation by information. —

Under this section authorizing the legislature to “change, regulate or abolish” the grand jury system, the grand jury system may be continued in use concurrently with accusation by information. In re Boulter, 5 Wyo. 329, 40 P. 520,

1895 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(Wyo. 1895).

Removal of public officer by governor. —

Statute authorizing the governor to remove public officer from office did not violate this section. State ex rel. Wyckoff v. Ross, 31 Wyo. 500, 228 P. 636,

1924 Wyo. LEXIS 39

(Wyo. 1924).

Transfer of prisoner from industrial institute to penitentiary. —

Statute empowering board of charities and reform to transfer prisoner in industrial institute to penitentiary if it should appear he had been previously convicted of crime becomes part of sentence as though extended into court record, does not deny due process and is not a change of sentence but a carrying out of the original sentence. Uram v. Roach, 47 Wyo. 335, 37 P.2d 793,

1934 Wyo. LEXIS 27

(Wyo. 1934).

Jury and bailiff expenses may not be taxed as costs of prosecution against the convicted defendant.

The right to trial by jury in criminal prosecutions must be kept inviolate. Johnson v. State, 532 P.2d 598,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 134

(Wyo. 1975).

Appeal to district court from police justice. —

On appeal to district court from a police justice, provision of city charter that such case should stand trial in the district court upon transcript and that no trial de novo shall be had was held not violative of this section. Stutsman v. Cheyenne, 18 Wyo. 499, 113 P. 322,

1911 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(Wyo. 1911).

Modification of verdict in criminal case by appellate court. —

Modification by appellate court of verdict of murder in second degree to one of manslaughter was authorized and not an infringement of right to jury trial. State v. Sorrentino, 36 Wyo. 111, 253 P. 14,

1927 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1927).

Defendant's right to a fair trial not denied by prosecutorial line of questioning. —

In a drug case, defendant was not denied the right to a fair trial where the State “forced” her to call the credibility of the State's witnesses into question by essentially forcing her to allege that the State's witnesses were all part of some vast conspiracy because the questions were reasonably related to the subject matter of the direct examination, were not intended as an improper search for opinion testimony, and were not aimed at an evaluation of the credibility of the State's witnesses but were instead a search for an explanation of the evidence against defendant. Lafond v. State, 2004 WY 51, 89 P.3d 324,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 61

(Wyo. 2004), reh'g denied,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 73

(Wyo. May 25, 2004).

In a drug case, defendant was not denied the right to a fair trial by the State's “personal attack” on defense counsel and a comment that defendant and defense counsel were deserving of shame where the prosecutor's comments appeared to have been made to counter the idea that a witness was irresponsible and a drunk, they were the only statements of their kind, and they appeared in isolation. Lafond v. State, 2004 WY 51, 89 P.3d 324,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 61

(Wyo. 2004), reh'g denied,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 73

(Wyo. May 25, 2004).

In a drug case, defendant was not denied the right to a fair trial by the prosecutor's comment that she “did it” where the prosecutor's comments were not meant to imply that he was relying upon information outside the evidence presented at trial and likewise appeared not to have been a statement of the prosecutor's personal beliefs but instead suggested findings of fact and conclusions that could have been drawn from those facts. Lafond v. State, 2004 WY 51, 89 P.3d 324,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 61

(Wyo. 2004), reh'g denied,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 73

(Wyo. May 25, 2004).

Applied

in

Hopkinson v. State, 664 P.2d 43,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 325

(Wyo. 1983); Vaupel v. State, 708 P.2d 1248,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 627

(Wyo. 1985); Mills v. Reynolds, 807 P.2d 383,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(Wyo. 1991); Williams v. State, 2002 WY 136, 54 P.3d 248,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 147

(Wyo. 2002); White v. State, 2003 WY 163, 80 P.3d 642,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 200

(Wyo. 2003).

Quoted

in

Hyatt Bros. ex rel. Hyatt v. Hyatt, 769 P.2d 329,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(Wyo. 1989).

Cited

in

Moore v. Jarvis, 44 Wyo. 92, 8 P.2d 818,

1932 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(1932); Scott v. Elwood, 77 Wyo. 428, 317 P.2d 513,

1957 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(1957); Hays v. State, 522 P.2d 1004,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 209

(Wyo. 1974); Cranston v. Thomson, 530 P.2d 726,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 124

(Wyo. 1975); Madrid v. State, 592 P.2d 709,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 508

(Wyo. 1979); Wilson v. State, 655 P.2d 1246,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 407

(Wyo. 1982); De Sersa v. State, 729 P.2d 662,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 645

(Wyo. 1986); Hoem v. State, 756 P.2d 780,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 88

(Wyo. 1988); Saldana v. State, 846 P.2d 604,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 1993); Lancaster v. State, 2002 WY 45, 43 P.3d 80,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 49

(Wyo. 2002); O'Brien v. State, 2002 WY 63, 45 P.3d 225,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 64

(Wyo. 2002); Sam v. State, 2017 WY 98, 401 P.3d 834,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 99

(Wyo. 2017).

Law reviews. —

For note, “Trial By Jury in a Felony Case — A Mandatory Requirement?” see 19 Wyo. L.J. 26 (1964).

For article, “Wyoming Foreclosure Decrees — Personal Judgments and the Right to Jury Trial,” see IV Land & Water L. Rev. 227 (1969).

For comment, “The Constitutionality of Automobile Compensation Plans in Wyoming,” see V Land & Water L. Rev. 191 (1970).

For comment, “Immunity and the Grand Jury,” see VIII Land & Water L. Rev. 629 (1973).

For case note, “Constitutional Law — Does the New Death Qualification Standard Ensure a Biased Jury? Wainwright v. Witt, 469 U.S. 412, 83 L. Ed. 2d 841, 105 S. Ct. 844, 1985 U.S. LEXIS 43 (1985),” see XXI Land & Water L. Rev. 579 (1986).

For case note, “Criminal Procedure — When Should a Jury Trial Be Required in the Wyoming Municipal Courts? City of Casper v. Cheatham, 739 P.2d 1222,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 471

(Wyo. 1987),” see XXV Land & Water L. Rev. 611 (1990).

For case note, “Appeal and Error—The Omnipotent Wyoming Supreme Court: New Allegations and Evidence Will Be Heard for the First Time on Appeal. Boller v. Western Law Associates, 828 P.2d 1184,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 38

(Wyo. 1992),” see XXVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 677 (1993).

For case note, “Constitutional Law — A Petty Mail Fraud Case With Serious Implications: The Supreme Court Extends the Petty Offense Doctrine to Multiple Petty Offenses in Lewis v. United States, 518 U.S. 322, 116 S. Ct. 2163, 135 L. Ed. 2d 590, 1996 U.S. LEXIS 4241 (1996),” see XXXII Land & Water L. Rev. 859 (1997).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Constitutional right to jury trial in proceeding for adjudication of incompetency or insanity or for restoration, 33 ALR2d 1145.

Validity and efficacy of accused's waiver of unanimous verdict, 97 ALR3d 1253.

Authority of state court to order jury trial in civil case where jury has been waived or not demanded by parties, 9 ALR4th 1041.

Validity of agreement, by stipulation or waiver in state civil case, to accept verdict by number or proportion of jurors less than that constitutionally permitted, 15 ALR4th 213.

Right to jury trial in stockholders' derivative action, 32 ALR4th 1111.

Right of accused, in state criminal trial, to insist, over prosecutor's or court's objection, on trial by court without jury, 37 ALR4th 304.

Materiality of testimony forming basis of perjury charge as question for court or jury in state trial, 37 ALR4th 948.

Jury trial waiver as binding on later state civil trial, 48 ALR4th 747.

Paternity proceedings: right to jury trial, 51 ALR4th 565.

Right to jury trial in action for retaliatory discharge from employment, 52 ALR4th 1141.

Right to jury trial in state court divorce proceedings, 56 ALR4th 955.

Small claims: jury trial rights in, and on appeal from, small claims court proceeding, 70 ALR4th 1119.

Exclusion of public and media from voir dire examination of prospective jurors in state criminal case, 16 ALR5th 152.

Contractual jury trial waivers in state civil cases, 42 ALR5th 53.

Constitutional right to jury trial in cause of action under state unfair or deceptive trade practices law, 54 ALR5th 631.

Propriety of using anonymous juries in state criminal cases, 60 ALR5th 39.

Right to jury trial in child neglect, child abuse, or termination of parental rights proceedings, 102 ALR5th 227.

Complexity of civil action as affecting seventh amendment right to trial by jury, 54 ALR Fed 733.

Oral stipulation to proceed in federal criminal trial with less than 12 jurors as satisfying Rule 23(b) of Federal Rules of Criminal Procedure, 57 ALR Fed 367.

Waiver of right to trial by jury as affecting right to trial by jury on subsequent trial of same case in federal court, 66 ALR Fed 859.

Standing of criminal defendant to challenge, on constitutional grounds, discriminatory composition of federal grand jury where defendant is not member of class allegedly excluded, 68 ALR Fed 175.

Propriety of ordering separate trials as to liability and damages, under Rule 42(b) of Federal Rules of Civil Procedure, in actions involving personal injury, death or property damage, 78 ALR Fed 890.

Propriety of blanket or per se rule prohibiting federal grand jury from indicting witness who has previously testified before same grand jury under grant of use immunity, 139 ALR Fed 489.

Right to jury trial on issue of damages in copyright infringement actions under 17 U.S.C. § 50, 163 ALR Fed 467.

Validity and application of computerized jury selection practice or procedure, 110 ALR5th 329.

Denial of accused's request for initial contact with attorney — drunk driving cases, 109 ALR5th 611.